Utah statutes.
64-13-21.5.   Powers of correctional officers and POST certified correctional enforcement or investigation officers.

(1)  Employees of the department who are designated by the executive director as correctional officers may exercise the powers and authority of a peace officer only when needed to properly carry out the following functions:

(a)  performing the officer's duties within the boundaries of a correctional facility;

(b)  supervising an offender during transportation;

(c)  when in fresh pursuit of an offender who has escaped from the custody of the department; or

(d)  when requested to assist a local, state, or federal law enforcement agency.

(2)  Employees of the department who are POST certified as law enforcement officers or correctional officers and who are designated as correctional enforcement or investigation officers have the following duties as specified by the executive director:

(a)  providing investigative services for the department;

(b)  conducting criminal investigations and operations in cooperation with state, local, and federal law enforcement agencies; and

(c)  providing security and enforcement for the department.

